Utah statutes.
63M-1-1204.   Utah Capital Investment Board.
(1)  There is created within the office the Utah Capital Investment Board to
exercise the powers conferred by this part.
(2)  The purpose of the board is to mobilize venture equity capital for
investment in a manner that will result in a significant potential to create
jobs and to diversify and stabilize the economy of the state.
(3)  In the exercise of its powers and duties, the board is considered to be
performing an essential public purpose.
